Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 1. Eminent Domain and Damages.
§ 33.2-1016.
Procedure in general; suits in name of Commissioner of Highways; survival; validation of suits; notice of filing.

Proceedings for condemnation under this article shall be instituted and conducted in accordance with the procedures provided in Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1, except that the provisions of §§

33.2-1018

through

33.2-1029.1

shall be applicable to such proceedings.

All suits shall be instituted and conducted in the name of the Commissioner of Highways as petitioner without naming the individual who may be such Commissioner of Highways or acting Commissioner of Highways. In the event of the death, removal, retirement, or resignation of the Commissioner of Highways or acting Commissioner of Highways, the suit shall automatically survive to a successor Commissioner of Highways or acting Commissioner of Highways. All suits heretofore filed in accordance with the provisions of this section are hereby ratified, validated, and confirmed.

In addition to any other notices required to be served pursuant to this section, in any proceeding instituted by the Commissioner of Highways under this title, a copy of the notice of the filing of the petition also shall be served, in the same manner as such notice is served upon owners, upon any person owning structures or improvements for which an outdoor advertising permit has been issued by the Commissioner of Highways pursuant to §

33.2-1208

.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-59; 1960, c. 491; 1964, c. 383; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-98; 1972, c. 765; 2003, c. 940; 2014, c. 805; 2022, c. 735.

Cross references.

As to power of railroads to condemn, see § 56-347.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 735, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply only to the taking of or damage to property that has occurred on or after July 1, 2022, or a condemnation proceeding that has been filed on or after July 1, 2022, as appropriate.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 735, substituted “33.2-1029.1” for “33.2-1029” in subsection A.

§ 33.2-1017.
Taking highway materials from streams, rivers, and watercourses.

Whenever the Commissioner of Highways determines that it is necessary or desirable to remove materials from the streams, rivers, or watercourses for use on public highways, he shall submit to the Marine Resources Commission his plan for the removal and all conditions relating thereto for its review and concurrence. After receiving the concurrence of the Marine Resources Commission, the Commissioner of Highways may take for use on the public highways in the Commonwealth sand, gravel, rock, and any other materials deemed by him suitable for road purposes from the streams, rivers, and watercourses, title to the bed of which is in the Commonwealth, and in addition to the power of eminent domain already vested in him may acquire by condemnation all property, rights, and easements necessary to enable him to obtain and make use of such materials. All such proceedings shall be governed by the provisions of law governing the exercise by the Commissioner of Highways of the power of eminent domain for state highway purposes.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-69; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-117; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to condemnation proceedings by localities generally, see §

15.2-1902

.

§ 33.2-1018.
Authority to take possession and title to property before or during condemnation; purpose and intent of provisions.

In addition to the exercise of the power of eminent domain prior to the entry upon land being condemned, as provided in this article, the Commissioner of Highways is authorized to acquire title and to enter upon and take possession of such property and rights-of-way, for the purposes set out in §

33.2-1001

, as the Commissioner of Highways may deem necessary, and proceed with the construction of such highway, such taking to be made pursuant to §§

33.2-1019

through

33.2-1029.1

.

It is the intention of this article to provide that such property and rights-of-way may, in the discretion of the Commissioner of Highways, be condemned during or after the construction of the highway, as well as prior thereto, and to direct the fund out of which the judgment of the court in condemnation proceedings shall be paid, and to provide that in all other respects the provisions of this article shall apply, whether the property and rights-of-way are condemned before, during, or after the construction of the highway. However, the authorities constructing such highway under the authority of this article shall use diligence to protect growing crops and pastures and to prevent damage to any property not taken. So far as possible all rights-of-way shall be acquired or contracted for before any condemnation is resorted to.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-70.1; 1958, c. 581; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-119; 2014, c. 805; 2022, c. 735.

Cross references.

As to determination just compensation, see §

25.1-230

.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 735, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply only to the taking of or damage to property that has occurred on or after July 1, 2022, or a condemnation proceeding that has been filed on or after July 1, 2022, as appropriate.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 735, substituted “33.2-1029.1” for “33.2-1029” in the first paragraph.

§ 33.2-1019.
Payments into court or filing certificate of deposit before entering upon land.

Before entering upon or taking possession of land pursuant to §

33.2-1018

, the Commissioner of Highways shall either:

Pay into the court wherein condemnation proceedings are pending or are to be instituted such sum as is required by subsection B; or

File with the court wherein condemnation proceedings are pending or are to be instituted a certificate of deposit issued by the Commissioner of Highways for such sum as is required by subsection B, which shall be deemed and held for the purpose of this chapter to be payment into the custody of such court.

The amount to be paid into the court as provided in subdivision A 1 or represented by a certificate of deposit as provided in subdivision A 2 shall be the amount that the Commissioner of Highways estimates to be the fair value of the land taken, or interest therein sought, and damage done, which estimate shall be based on a bona fide appraisal if required by §

25.1-417

; however, such estimate shall not be less than the current assessed value of the land for real estate tax purposes, unless the property has physically changed in a material and substantial way since the current assessment date such that the real estate tax assessment no longer represents a fair valuation of the property, when the entire parcel for which the assessment has been made is to be acquired.

If the Commissioner of Highways makes a payment into court as provided in subdivision A 1, the court shall also record a certificate of take pursuant to §

33.2-1021

. The clerk shall deposit such funds to the credit of the court in an account of a type that bears interest.

Payment against a certificate of deposit, when ordered by the court named therein, shall be paid by the Commissioner of Highways.

The Commissioner of Highways shall not be permitted to force relocation on improved owner-occupied property until the owner is permitted to withdraw the funds represented by the certificate filed with the court. However, if the owner refuses to withdraw the funds represented by the certificate filed with the court or if the Commissioner of Highways reasonably believes that the owner does not possess clear title to the property being taken, that ownership of the property is disputed, or that certain owners cannot be located, the Commissioner of Highways may petition the court to establish that the owner does not possess clear title, that the ownership of the property is in dispute, that certain owners cannot be located, or that the owner has refused to withdraw the funds represented by the certificate filed with the court, and request that the Commissioner of Highways be given authority to force relocation.

Nothing in this section shall make evidence of tax assessments admissible as proof of value in an eminent domain proceeding.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-70.2; 1958, c. 581; 1970, cc. 322, 684, § 33.1-120; 2003, c. 940; 2004, c. 803; 2013, c. 764; 2014, c. 805; 2022, c. 735.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 735, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply only to the taking of or damage to property that has occurred on or after July 1, 2022, or a condemnation proceeding that has been filed on or after July 1, 2022, as appropriate.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 735, inserted the last sentence in subclause C.

§ 33.2-1020.
Payment of certificates of deposit; recordation of certain certificates; notice to owner.

A certificate of deposit shall be deemed and held for the purpose of this article to be payment into the custody of such court. Payment against any certificate of deposit so issued and countersigned, when ordered by the court named therein, shall be paid by the State Treasurer on warrants of the Comptroller, issued on vouchers signed by the Commissioner of Highways.

A duplicate of each certificate of deposit so issued and countersigned shall be kept as a record in the office of the Commissioner of Highways and a copy thereof shall be filed with the State Treasurer.

The Commissioner of Highways shall give notice, between 30 and 45 days prior to the date on which any certificate will be filed or recorded pursuant to this chapter, to the owner or tenant, if known, of the freehold by certified or registered mail that such certificate will be filed or recorded. Additionally, within four business days of the filing or recording of a certificate, the Commissioner of Highways shall give notice of such filing or recording to the owner or tenant, if known, of the freehold by providing a copy of such certificate by certified or registered mail.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-70.3; 1958, c. 581; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-121; 2003, c. 940; 2014, c. 805; 2017, c. 563; 2019, cc. 82, 162.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 563 rewrote subsection C, which formerly read: “The Commissioner of Highways shall give notice to the owner or tenant of the freehold by registered mail, if known, that a certificate of deposit will be filed.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 82 and 162 are identical, and substituted “such certificate” for “such certificate of deposit” in subsection C.

§ 33.2-1021.
Recordation of certificates; transfer of title or interest; land situated in two or more counties or cities.

Upon recordation of a certificate:

The interest or estate of the owner of the property described therein shall terminate;

The title to such property or interest or estate of the owner shall be vested in the Commonwealth;

The owner shall have such interest or estate in the funds deposited with the court or represented by the certificate of deposit as the owner had in the property taken or damaged; and

All liens by deed of trust, judgment, or otherwise upon such property or estate or interest shall be transferred to such funds.

The title in the Commonwealth shall be defeasible until (i) the Commonwealth and such owner reach an agreement as provided in §

33.2-1027

or (ii) the compensation for the taking or damage to the property is determined by condemnation proceedings as provided in §§

33.2-1022

through

33.2-1028

.

If the land affected by the certificate is situated in two or more counties or cities, the clerk of the court wherein the certificate is recorded shall certify a copy of such certificate to the clerk of the court of the counties or cities in which any portion of the land lies, who shall record the same in his deed book and index it in the name of the person who had the land before and also in the name of the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-70.4; 1958, c. 581; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-122; 2014, c. 805; 2020, c. 1245.

Cross references.

As to fees for recording certificates, see §

17.1-275

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, c. 1245, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions if this act shall not apply to condemnation proceedings in which the petitioner filed, prior to July 1, 2002, (i) a petition in condemnation pursuant to Chapter 2 ( §

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1 of the Code of Virginia or (ii) a certificate of take or deposit pursuant to Chapter 3 ( §

25.1-300

et seq.) of Title 25.1 or Title 33.2 of the Code of Virginia. Any condemnation proceedings in which the petitioner filed a petition or certificate described in clause (i) or (ii) on or after July 1, 2005, and prior to July 1, 2020, shall be governed by the provisions of the Code of Virginia in effect prior to July 1, 2020.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1245, deleted the introductory paragraph, which read, “The certificate of the Commissioner of Highways shall be recorded in the clerk’s office of the court where deeds are recorded”; added the designations for subsections A through C and for subdivisions A 1 through A 4; rewrote subsection A, which read, “Upon such recordation, the interest or estate of the owner of such property shall terminate and the title to such property or interest or estate of the owner shall be vested in the Commonwealth. Such owner shall have such interest or estate in the funds held on deposit by virtue of the certificate as he had in the property taken or damaged, and all liens by deed of trust, judgment, or otherwise upon such property or estate or interest shall be transferred to such funds”; and in subsection B, substituted “(i) the Commonwealth and such owner reach an agreement as provided in §

33.2-1027

or (ii) the compensation for the taking or damage to the property is” for “the reaching of an agreement between the Commissioner of Highways and such owner, as provided in §

33.2-1027

, or the compensation.” For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 33.2-1022.
Certificates to describe land and list owner.

The certificate shall set forth the description of the land or interest therein being taken or damaged and, if known, the owner. If a temporary construction easement is being acquired, the certificate shall set forth the calendar date on which it shall expire, if such date is known or can be reasonably estimated, or, if certified that such date is not known, at such time the date is ascertained, the Commissioner of Highways shall file certification of the information as provided by subsection B of §

25.1-307

and shall simultaneously provide the landowner or the landowner’s counsel, if any, a copy of such certification.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-70.5; 1958, c. 581; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-123; 2014, c. 805; 2022, c. 735.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 735, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply only to the taking of or damage to property that has occurred on or after July 1, 2022, or a condemnation proceeding that has been filed on or after July 1, 2022, as appropriate.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 735, inserted the last sentence.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Identification of restrictive covenant as property interest taken or damaged. —

Where a Certificate of Take described the land to be taken and certified that the sum paid into court was the fair value of the land described, “or interest therein, and damages to the remainder, if any,” the Certificate of Take was valid because it clearly advised the owner that the property taken included not just the land itself but also all the interest therein, including restrictive covenants, owned by or for the benefit of the owner. NBS Loudoun Gateway IV, L.L.C. v. Commonwealth Transp. Comm'r, 63 Va. Cir. 342, 2003 Va. Cir. LEXIS 332 (Loudoun County Nov. 4, 2003) (decided under prior law).

§ 33.2-1023.
Proceedings for distribution of funds; effect of acceptance of payments; evidence as to amount of deposit or certificate.

Any person or persons shown by a certificate to be entitled thereto may petition the court for the distribution of all or any part of the funds deposited with the court pursuant to subdivision A 1 of §

33.2-1019

or represented by a certificate of deposit filed pursuant to subdivision A 2 of §

33.2-1019

. Any costs of filing such petition or otherwise withdrawing the funds shall be taxed against the Commissioner of Highways.

A copy of such petition shall be served on the Commissioner of Highways, his deputy, or any attorney authorized to accept service with a notice, returnable to the court or judge not less than 21 days after such service, to show cause, if any, why such amount should not be distributed in accordance with the prayers of the petition.

If the Commissioner of Highways does not, on or before the return day of the petition, show such cause, and if the record in the proceeding does not disclose any denial or dispute with respect thereto, the court shall enter an order directing the distribution of such amount in accordance with the prayers of the petition. However, in the case of a nonresident petitioner the court may require a bond before ordering the distribution.

If funds have been deposited with the court pursuant to subdivision A 1 of §

33.2-1019

, any interest that has accrued on the funds shall be payable to the person or persons entitled to receive such funds.

If funds are not then on deposit with the court but are represented by a certificate of deposit filed pursuant to subdivision A 2 of §

33.2-1019

, a certified copy of such order shall forthwith be sent to the Commissioner of Highways by the clerk. It shall be the duty of the Commissioner of Highways to deposit such funds with the court within 21 days of the date of such order.

Interest shall be payable on funds represented by a certificate of deposit from the date of filing of the certificate of deposit until the funds are paid into court at no less than the judgment rate of interest as set forth in §

8.01-382

. However, interest shall not accrue if an injunction is filed against the Department that enjoins the taking of the property described in the certificate.

If the Commissioner of Highways shows such cause, or if the record in the proceeding discloses any denial or dispute as to the persons entitled to such distribution or to any interest or share therein, the court shall direct such proceedings as are provided by §

25.1-240

for the distribution of awards.

However, the acceptance of such payment shall not limit the amount to be allowed by a commissioner in a condemnation proceeding, nor limit the rights of any party or parties to the proceeding to appeal from any decision therein; nor shall any party to such proceeding be entitled to introduce evidence of any amount deposited with the court or represented by a certificate, nor of any amount that has been accepted by any party entitled thereto pursuant to this section.

All funds due and owing pursuant to this section shall be payable promptly to the owner or, if the owner consents, to the owner’s attorney. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the priority of liens or any obligation to satisfy or release any outstanding liens on the property or the funds.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-70.6; 1958, c. 581; 1964, c. 487; 1968, c. 232; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-124; 1972, c. 765; 1985, c. 594; 1987, c. 641; 1994, c. 584; 2003, cc. 19, 47, 940; 2014, c. 805; 2020, c. 1245.

Cross references.

As to filing fees, see §

17.1-275

.

As to similar provisions regarding proceedings for distribution of funds and effect of acceptance of payments, see §§

25.1-310

,

25.1-311

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, c. 1245, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions if this act shall not apply to condemnation proceedings in which the petitioner filed, prior to July 1, 2002, (i) a petition in condemnation pursuant to Chapter 2 ( §

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1 of the Code of Virginia or (ii) a certificate of take or deposit pursuant to Chapter 3 ( §

25.1-300

et seq.) of Title 25.1 or Title 33.2 of the Code of Virginia. Any condemnation proceedings in which the petitioner filed a petition or certificate described in clause (i) or (ii) on or after July 1, 2005, and prior to July 1, 2020, shall be governed by the provisions of the Code of Virginia in effect prior to July 1, 2020.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1245, in subsection A, added the last sentence; in subsection F, substituted “no less than the judgment rate of interest as set forth in §

8.01-382

” for “the rate of interest established pursuant to § 6621(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, for the month in which the order pursuant to this section is entered” in the first sentence and added subsection I. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-423 Petition for Distribution of Funds; No. 6-424 Order for Distribution of Funds.

§ 33.2-1024.
Reformation, alteration, revision, amendment, or invalidation of certificate.

Upon the recordation of such certificate, no reformation, alteration, revision, amendment, or invalidation shall be made for any purpose without the prior consent of the court wherein such certificate is recorded. The court shall have jurisdiction to reform, alter, revise, amend, or invalidate in whole or in part any certificate; to correct mistakes in the description of the property affected by such certificate; to correct the name of the owner in the certificate; to correct any other error that may exist with respect to such certificate; or for any other purpose. A petition filed by the Commissioner of Highways with the court setting forth any error made in such certificate, or the necessity of any change therein, shall be deemed sufficient basis for the reformation, alteration, revision, amendment, or invalidation in whole or in part of such certificate. The court may enter an order permitting the reformation, alteration, revision, amendment, or invalidation in whole or in part, and such order, together with any revised certificate that may be necessary, shall be recorded in the current deed book. The filing of any certificate pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not alter the date of taking as established by the filing of the original certificate pursuant to §

33.2-1021

as to any land that is included in the amended certificate, and no such amended certificate shall include any land not in the original certificate. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit or preclude any person from recovering any damages in a condemnation proceeding resulting from such reformation, alteration, revision, amendment, or invalidation.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-70.7; 1958, c. 581; 1968, c. 313; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-125; 1993, c. 35; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 256; 2019, c. 788.

Cross references.

As to filing fees, see §

17.1-275

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2019, c. 788, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to condemnation proceedings in which the petitioner filed, prior to July 1, 2019, (i) a petition in condemnation pursuant to Chapter 2 ( §

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1 of the Code of Virginia or (ii) a certificate of take or deposit pursuant to Title 33.2 or Chapter 3 ( §

25.1-300

et seq.) of Title 25.1 of the Code of Virginia. Any condemnation proceedings in which the petitioner filed a petition or certificate described in clause (i) or (ii) on or after July 1, 2005, and prior to July 1, 2019, shall be governed by the provisions of the Code of Virginia in effect prior to July 1, 2019.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 256 substituted “recorded” for “spread” in the fourth sentence; in the last sentence, substituted “in this section” for “herein contained,” and “provided in this section” for
“herein provided” in the last sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 788 substituted “from recovering any damages in a condemnation proceeding resulting from such reformation, alteration, revision, amendment, or invalidation” for “damaged thereby from showing in the proper proceeding the damage suffered by reason of such mistake or the invalidation of a certificate of deposit as provided in this section.” For applicability, see Editor’s note.

§ 33.2-1025.
When condemnation proceedings instituted; payment of compensation or damages; order confirming award; recording.

Within 180 days after the recordation of such certificate, if the Commissioner of Highways and the owner of such lands or interest therein taken or damaged by the Commissioner of Highways are unable to agree as to the compensation or damages, if any, caused thereby, or such consent cannot be obtained due to the incapacity of the owner, or because such owner is unknown or cannot with reasonable diligence be found within the Commonwealth, the Commissioner of Highways shall institute condemnation proceedings, as provided in this article, unless said proceedings shall have been instituted prior to the recordation of such certificate. The amount of such compensation and damages, if any, awarded to the owner in such proceedings shall be paid out of the appropriations to the Department. The final order confirming the award of the Commissioner of Highways shall confirm absolute and indefeasible title to the land, or interest therein sought, in the Commonwealth and shall be recorded in the current deed book.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-70.9; 1958, c. 581; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-127; 1993, c. 35; 2003, c. 317; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 256.

Cross references.

As to similar provisions regarding institution of condemnation
proceedings, order confirming award and recordation, see §§

25.1-313

,

25.1-314

.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 256 substituted “recorded” for “spread” in the last sentence.

§ 33.2-1026.
Awards in greater or lesser amounts than deposit; interest.

If the amount of an award in a condemnation proceeding is greater than that deposited with the court or represented by a certificate of deposit, the excess amount, together with interest accrued on such excess amount, shall be paid into court for the person entitled thereto. The clerk shall deposit such funds to the credit of the court in an account of a type that bears interest.

Interest shall accrue on the excess amount at not less than the judgment rate of interest as set forth in §

8.01-382

, computed from the date of such deposit to the date of payment into court, and shall be paid into court for the person or persons entitled thereto. However, any (i) interest accruing after June 30, 1970, and prior to July 1, 1981, shall be paid at the rate of six percent; (ii) interest accruing after June 30, 1981, and prior to July 1, 1994, shall be paid at the rate of eight percent; and (iii) interest accruing after June 30, 1994, and prior to July 1, 2003, shall be paid at the general account composite rate, compiled by the Department of the Treasury for the month in which the award is rendered.

If the amount of an award in a condemnation proceeding is less than that deposited with the court or represented by a certificate of deposit, and the person or persons entitled thereto have received a distribution of the funds pursuant to §

33.2-1023

, the Commissioner of Highways shall recover (i) the amount of such excess and (ii) interest on such excess at the rate of interest established pursuant to § 6621(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended. If any person has been paid a greater sum than that to which he is entitled as determined by the award, judgment shall be entered for the Commissioner of Highways against such person for the amount of such excess and interest. However, the Commissioner of Highways shall not be entitled to recover the amount of such excess and interest in the event the Commissioner of Highways acquired, by virtue of the certificate, an entire parcel of land containing a dwelling, multiple-family dwelling, or building used for commercial purposes at the time of initiation of negotiations for the acquisition of such property.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-70.10; 1958, c. 581; 1970, cc. 322, 614, § 33.1-128; 1981, c. 476; 1994, c. 584; 1997, c. 865; 2003, cc. 19, 47, 318, 940; 2010, cc. 20, 53; 2014, c. 805; 2017, c. 710; 2022, c. 735.

Cross references.

As to similar provisions regarding awards in greater and lesser amounts than deposit, see §§

25.1-315

,

25.1-316

.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 735, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply only to the taking of or damage to property that has occurred on or after July 1, 2022, or a condemnation proceeding that has been filed on or after July 1, 2022, as appropriate.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 710 substituted “not less than the judgment rate of interest as set forth in §

8.01-382

” for “the rate of interest established pursuant to § 6621(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, compiled by the Department for the month in which the award is rendered” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 735, inserted the last sentence in subsection A.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-412 Order Granting Right of Entry; 6-424 Order for Distribution of Funds.

§ 33.2-1027.
Agreements as to compensation; petition and order of court thereon; disposition of deposit.

At any time after the recordation of such certificate, but prior to the institution of condemnation proceedings, if the Commissioner of Highways and the owner of the land or interest therein taken or damaged are able to agree as to compensation for the land taken and damages, if any, caused by such taking, the Commissioner of Highways shall file with the court a petition so stating, with a copy of the agreement attached. If condemnation proceedings are already pending at the time of reaching such agreement, no such petition shall be required, but the motion for dismissal of such proceedings shall contain an averment that such agreement has been reached. Upon the filing of such petition or motion to dismiss, the court shall thereupon enter an order confirming absolute and indefeasible title to the land or interest therein in the Commonwealth. Such order shall be recorded in the current deed book. Upon entry of such order, the Commissioner of Highways and State Treasurer shall be relieved of further obligation by virtue of having filed such certificate of deposit with the court.

If it shall appear from such petition and agreement, or motion to dismiss a pending suit, that no person other than those executing such agreement are entitled to the fund on deposit, the court shall direct that such fund, after payment therefrom of any taxes that may be charged against such land taken, be disbursed and distributed in accordance with the statement or charge in the petition or motion among the parties or persons entitled thereto. If it shall appear that a controversy exists as to the persons entitled to such fund, such distribution shall be made in accordance with the provisions of §

33.2-1023

.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-70.11; 1958, c. 581; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-129; 1993, c. 35; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 256.

Cross references.

As to filing fees, see §

17.1-275

.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 256 substituted “recorded” for “spread” in the fourth sentence of the first paragraph.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-426 Checklist for Order Confirming Title and Directing Disbursement.

§ 33.2-1027.1.
Distribution of funds to owner or owner’s attorney.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, upon any settlement or final determination resulting in a judgment for the owner, whether funds have been paid into the court or are outstanding, all such funds due and owing shall be payable to the owner or, if the owner consents, to the owner’s attorney within 30 days of the settlement or final determination, unless otherwise subject to §

25.1-240

,

25.1-241

,

25.1-243

, or

25.1-250

. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the priority of liens or any obligation to satisfy or release any outstanding liens on the property or the funds.

History.

2018, c. 842.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-418 Order Upon Report of Jury/Commissioners; No. 6-419 Order Confirming Report of Jury/Commissioners; No. 6-420 Order Upon Settlement.

§ 33.2-1028.
Enhancement to be offset against damage.

In all cases under the provisions of this article, the enhancement, if any, in value of the remaining property of the landowner by reason of the construction or improvement contemplated or made by the Commissioner of Highways shall be offset against the damage, if any, resulting to such remaining property of such landowner by reason of such construction or improvement. However, such enhancement in value shall not be offset against the value of the property taken, and if such enhancement in value exceeds the damage, there shall be no recovery against the landowner for such excess.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-73; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-130; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1029.
(Repealed) Remedy of landowners under certain conditions.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-75; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-132; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 141; 1972, c. 765; 1991, c. 520; 2003, cc. 317, 940; 2004, c. 804; 2014, c. 805; repealed by 2022, c. 735.

§ 33.2-1029.1.
(See Editor’s Note) Petition by owner for determination of just compensation.

The owner of property that the Commissioner of Highways has entered and taken possession of, or taken defeasible title of, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may petition the circuit court of the locality in which the greater portion of the property lies for the appointment of commissioners or the empanelment of a jury to determine just compensation for the property taken and damage done, if any, to such property, as provided in Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1 if (i) the owner and the Commissioner of Highways have not reached an agreement as to compensation and damages, if any, and (ii) the Commissioner of Highways:

Has not completed the construction of the contemplated improvements upon the property after a reasonable time for such construction has elapsed; or

Has not instituted condemnation proceedings within:

Sixty days after completion of the construction of the contemplated improvements upon the property;

One hundred and eighty days after the Commissioner of Highways has entered upon and taken possession of the property, regardless of whether the construction of the contemplated improvements has been completed; or

One hundred and eighty days after the recordation of a certificate.

A copy of such petition shall be served on the Commissioner of Highways at least 10 days before it is filed in the court. The Commissioner of Highways shall file an answer within five days after the filing of the petition. If the courts finds that the conditions prerequisite for such appointment as provided in subsection A are satisfied, the court shall appoint commissioners or empanel a jury, as requested in the owner’s petition, to ascertain the amount of compensation to be paid for the property taken and damages done, if any. The proceedings shall thereafter be governed by the procedures prescribed in Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1 insofar as they may be applicable, except that the owner shall have the burden of proceeding with the evidence as to just compensation. The Commissioner of Highways shall reimburse the owner for his fees and costs charged by the lienholder, including filing fees and attorney fees, incurred in filing the owner’s petition.

History.

2022, c. 735.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 735, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply only to the taking of or damage to property that has occurred on or after July 1, 2022, or a condemnation proceeding that has been filed on or after July 1, 2022, as appropriate.”

§ 33.2-1030.
Installation of broadband conduit.

Where a public highway exists pursuant to §

33.2-105

, the rights of the Commonwealth include the use of such public highway for communications purposes and specifically include the power of the Department to permit a broadband service provider to install, maintain, operate, repair, and replace within the public right of way underground lines, systems, and facilities necessary for the provision and extension of broadband services to the extent allowed by applicable land use permit regulations, policies, and procedures of the Department.

History.

2016, c. 655.

Editor’s note.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2016 act having been §

33.2-280.1

.